Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 6

Private Act Hospital Authority Act of 1996

7-57-601. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Private Act Hospital Authority Act of 1996.”

Acts 1996, ch. 778, § 1.

Cross-References. Property tax exemption for private act hospital authorities, §67-5-209.

Attorney General Opinions. Board of trustees of a hospital district may mortgage property to secure a line of credit, and it may place a second mortgage on the property for the benefit of cities and county, OAG 08-197 (12/31/08), 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 242.

7-57-602. “Private act hospital authority” defined.

For the purpose of this part, “private act hospital authority” is any hospital owned or operated by one (1) or more local governments or any hospital, hospital authority or hospital district created or authorized by a private act of the general assembly.

Acts 1996, ch. 778, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. County hospital board of trustees' authority to sell hospital, OAG 98-0119, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (7/2/98).

7-57-603. Rights and powers of authority — Procurement.

A private act hospital authority, as defined in this part, in addition to the rights and powers granted to such authority by any private act of the general assembly or its charter of incorporation, has as supplemental and additional rights and powers, all powers granted to private act metropolitan hospital authorities in part 5 of this chapter. Any powers granted under this part to a private act hospital authority shall not limit or reduce any power granted to a private act hospital authority by a private act of the general assembly or its charter of incorporation. The rights and powers granted to a private act hospital authority by this part shall not be applicable to any hospital that ceases to be either owned or operated by the governing authority or entity established under the hospital's private act. Nothing in this part shall require a private act hospital authority to bid the purchase or procurement of any goods or services that are not required to be bid by the private act creating such private act hospital authority or its charter of incorporation.

Acts 1996, ch. 778, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Powers of board of trustees of city hospital, OAG U97-037, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (7/28/97).

County hospital board of trustees' authority to sell hospital, OAG 98-0119, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (7/2/98).

Management and sale of Bradley County Memorial Hospital, OAG 00-045, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 45 (3/13/00).

7-57-604. Sale of hospital — Referendum.

With respect to the sale of hospital property, this part shall not be construed or implemented in any manner that abolishes or diminishes the public's opportunity to require a public referendum as authorized by a municipal charter.

Acts 1996, ch. 778, § 2.